Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2443.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Child Victim Recovery Fund.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Children's advocacy center." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6303 (relating to definitions)."Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and 123456789101112131415 Delinquency."Court." A court of common pleas."Covered offense." Any of the following offenses under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses):(1) Section 3123(b) or (c) (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(2) Section 3124.2(a.2) (relating to institutional sexual assault).(3) Section 3125(a)(7) or (8) (relating to aggravated indecent assault).(4) Section 3126(a)(7) or (8) (relating to indecent assault).(5) Section 6301(a)(1)(i) or (ii) (relating to corruption of minors).(6) Any other offense under 18 Pa.C.S. that is substantially similar to an offense specified under paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4) or (5) and in which a minor is identified in a charging document, plea or verdict as the victim of the offense."COVERED OFFENSE." AN OFFENSE LISTED UNDER 42 PA.C.S. § 9799.14 (RELATING TO SEXUAL OFFENSES AND TIER SYSTEM)."Fee." The Child Victim Recovery Fee imposed under section 3(a)."Fund." The Child Victim Recovery Fund established under section 5(a)."Indigent." An individual determined by a court to be unable to pay the fee without undue hardship based on the individual's financial resources and obligations."Minor." An individual under 18 years of age who is identified in a charging document, plea or verdict as the victim 20260HB2443PN3616 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a covered offense.Section 3. Child Victim Recovery Fee.(a) Imposition.--In addition to any other fines, costs or restitution ordered, a court shall impose a Child Victim Recovery Fee in each case in which any of the following applies:(1) A defendant is convicted of a covered offense.(2) A defendant pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a covered offense.(3) (2) A defendant is placed into a pretrial diversionary program or alternative disposition program for a covered offense, including Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition.(b) Amount.--The fee shall be imposed in the following amounts, as applicable:(1) $1,000 for a felony.(2) $400 for a misdemeanor.(3) $250 for placement into a pretrial diversionary program or alternative disposition program.(c) Timing for diversionary dispositions.--A court shall impose the fee at the time a defendant is accepted into a pretrial diversionary program or alternative disposition program. Payment of the fee shall be a condition of successful completion of the pretrial diversionary program or alternative disposition program.(d) Ability to pay.--If a court determines that a defendant is indigent, the court shall authorize payment of the fee by installment plan. The court may reduce the periodic installment amount to avoid undue hardship. PRIOR TO IMPOSING A FEE OR INSTALLMENT PAYMENT, THE COURT SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE DEFENDANT IS ABLE TO PAY IN ACCORDANCE WITH 42 PA.C.S. § 9730 20260HB2443PN3616 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (RELATING TO PAYMENT OF COURT COSTS, RESTITUTION AND FINES). THE COURT MAY NOT ESTABLISH A MANDATORY MINIMUM INSTALLMENT PAYMENT THAT IS NOT BASED ON THE INDIVIDUAL DEFENDANT'S ABILITY TO PAY.(e) Collection.--The fee shall be collected in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 9728 (relating to collection of restitution, reparation, fees, costs, fines and penalties). The obligation to pay the fee shall constitute a judgment and shall be entered and docketed as provided under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9728(b)(1) and (2).(f) Priority.--The fee may not reduce restitution ordered in a case. Collection and payment of restitution shall have priority as provided under all of the following:(1) 18 Pa.C.S. § 1106(c)(1)(ii) (relating to restitution for injuries to person or property).(2) 42 Pa.C.S. § 9728(g.1).Section 4. Deposit and remittance.(a) Deposit.--Money collected under section 3 shall be deposited into the fund.(b) Remittance.--The clerk of courts of the county in which the fee is imposed, or another county officer designated by the county, shall remit money collected under section 3 to the State Treasurer for deposit into the fund within five days of the end of each calendar quarter in a manner specified by the State Treasurer.Section 5. Child Victim Recovery Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Child Victim Recovery Fund is established in the State Treasury.(b) Use.--Money in the fund may be used only for the following purposes:(1) To award grants under section 6.(2) To pay the costs of administering this act, 20260HB2443PN3616 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including the costs of processing and monitoring grants, in an amount not to exceed 5% of money deposited into the fund in a fiscal year.(c) Appropriation.--Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the commission for the purposes specified under subsection (b).Section 6. Grants to children's advocacy centers.(a) Grants.--The commission shall award annual grants from the fund to children's advocacy centers for the purposes specified under section 7.(b) Eligibility.--A children's advocacy center shall be eligible to receive a grant under this section only if the children's advocacy center meets all of the following requirements:(1) The children's advocacy center is an accredited, associate, affiliate or satellite member of the National Children's Alliance or is located in an unserved county that has undertaken a formal process for development of a children's advocacy center.(2) The children's advocacy center provides services through a multidisciplinary team approach consistent with nationally recognized children's advocacy center standards.(3) The children's advocacy center submits an annual application in a form specified by the commission that includes all of the following:(i) A description of the children's advocacy center service area.(ii) The number of forensic interviews completed in the prior year.(iii) A spending plan identifying the intended use 20260HB2443PN3616 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of grant money under section 7.(iv) Any other documentation required by the commission to verify eligibility and appropriate use of money.(c) Noncompetitive formula.--The commission shall distribute grants on a noncompetitive, formula basis. The commission shall publish the formula on its publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Minimum factors.--In developing and updating the formula, the commission shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) The number of forensic interviews performed annually.(2) The geographic service area and population served.(3) The children's advocacy center's accreditation level or National Children's Alliance membership status.(e) Proration.--If money in the fund is insufficient to fully fund grants determined under the formula, the commission shall prorate grants proportionally among children's advocacy centers eligible for an award.(f) Additional requirements.--In addition to the application required under subsection (b)(3), the commission may require certifications, reporting and documentation necessary to administer this act and verify eligibility and appropriate use of grant money.(g) Supplanting prohibited.--Money awarded under this section may not be used to supplant Federal, State or local money otherwise available for the same purpose.(h) Loss of eligibility and recoupment.--A children's advocacy center that ceases to satisfy the eligibility requirements under subsection (b) shall notify the commission 20260HB2443PN3616 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within 30 days. The commission may suspend, reduce or terminate a grant and may seek repayment of money expended in violation of this act.Section 7. Permitted use of grant money.(a) Permitted uses.--A children's advocacy center may use grant money awarded under section 6 only for costs directly related to providing services to minor victims through the children's advocacy center, including any of the following:(1) Forensic interviews and medical evaluations.(2) Trauma-focused mental health services and recovery supports.(3) Victim advocacy, family support and crisis response.(4) Facility improvements and equipment.(5) Training and professional development for staff and multidisciplinary partners.(6) Program capacity building in underserved areas.(7) Accreditation, quality assurance and multidisciplinary team coordination activities necessary to meet children's advocacy center standards.(b) Records and audit.--A children's advocacy center shall maintain records as required by the commission. The commission may audit expenditures and require repayment of money expended in violation of this act.Section 8. Report.(a) Annual report.--The commission shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly and post the report on its publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Contents.--The report under subsection (a) shall include all of the following information for the prior fiscal year:(1) Total revenue collected and deposited into the fund.20260HB2443PN3616 - 7 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Total grant money awarded and the recipients.(3) Geographic distribution of grant money.(4) Administrative costs incurred to administer this act.(5) Statewide service measures, including the number of minors served and other performance indicators reported by recipients in a form prescribed by the commission.Section 9. Regulations and guidelines.The commission may promulgate regulations and adopt guidelines necessary to implement this act.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260HB2443PN3616 - 8 - 123456789101112